Hawaii statutes.
§54-12 Board of water supply. If a
county does not have an existing board of water supply, there shall be a board
of water supply for each county consisting of seven members of whom five shall
be nominated, and by and with the advice and consent of the council, appointed
by the mayor, one of whom shall be the state district engineer of the state
department of transportation and one of whom shall be the chief engineer of the
respective county.

No employee or officer of any county shall be
eligible to serve as a board member, except as otherwise provided herein.

The members of the board shall serve without
pay, but shall be reimbursed for their reasonable expenses incurred in the
discharge of their duties as members of the board.

The term of office of each appointed member of
the board shall be five years from the date of the member's appointment;
provided that of the initial members one shall be appointed for a term to
expire on January 1, 1963; one for a term to expire on January 1,
1964; one for a term to expire on January 1, 1965; one for a term to
expire on January 1, 1966; and one for a term to expire on January 1,
1967. Any vacancy occurring on the board shall be filled in accordance with
the foregoing provisions for the unexpired portion of the term concerned. [L
1961, c 155, pt of §1; Supp, §145A-2; am imp L 1967, c 80, §1; HRS §54-12; gen
ch 1985]

Case Notes

Provisions of this section inconsistent with county charter
provisions are superseded. 59 H. 65, 576 P.2d 1029.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next